West Virginia, session 2026, HB5650.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. WEST VIRGINIA MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT. §30-3-21. Naturopathic medicine permitted; conditions. (a) For the purposes of this section, "naturopathic medicine" means a distinct primary healthcare system that blends modern science with traditional, natural therapies to support the body's intrinsic self-healing process. (b) Naturopathic medicine is permitted to be practiced in this state: Provided, That all other provisions of this article shall be followed by the individual practicing naturopathic medicine, including but not limited to licensing, training, registration, and Board of Medicine oversight.